Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 4. Registration and Recognition of Orders from Other States

§ 3181.
Registration of guardianship orders.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in this State, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in this State by filing as a foreign judgment in a Probate Division of the Superior Court, in any appropriate county of this State, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3182.
Registration of protective orders.

If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a petition for a protective order is not pending in this State, the conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the protective order in this State by filing as a foreign judgment in a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State, in any county of this State in which property belonging to the protected person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3183.
Effect of registration.

Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian may exercise in this State all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this State, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this State and, if the guardian is not a resident of this State, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State may grant any relief available under this chapter and other law of this State to enforce a registered order.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3184.
Conveyance by guardian appointed by foreign jurisdiction.

A conveyance of an interest in Vermont real property by a guardian appointed by a foreign court for a person 18 years of age or older is valid, provided that:

the conveyance is authorized by a foreign court order; and

the foreign order is registered in Vermont pursuant to this subchapter.

For conveyances made prior to the May 4, 2017, no effect on marketability of title shall be created by either the failure to register the foreign order or the registration of the foreign order.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 24

, § 5, eff. May 4, 2017.